src/fst/morphology/affixes/Der_vv_IV.lexc
+SIMA+Der/vv+MMIRSUR+Der/vv+LLAR+Der/vv+NGAAR+Der/vv+GALUAR+Der/vv:simammersullangaaraluar IV-mod_C ;
+SIMA+Der/vv+MMIRSUR+Der/vv+LLAR+Der/vv+NGAAR+Der/vv+TSIAR+Der/vv:simammersullangaatsiar IV-mod_C ;
+SIMA+Der/vv+MMIRSUR+Der/vv+LLAR+Der/vv+NGAAR+Der/vv+TSIAR+Der/vv+GALUAR+Der/vv:simammersullangaatsiaraluar IV-mod_C ;
+SIMA+Der/vv+MMIRSUR+Der/vv+RIAR+Der/vv:simammersoriar IV-mod_C ;
+SIMA+Der/vv+MMIRSUR+Der/vv+RIAR+Der/vv+GALUAR+Der/vv:simammersoriaraluar IV-mod_C ;
+SIMA+Der/vv+MMIRSUR+Der/vv+TSIAR+Der/vv:simammersutsiar IV-mod_C ;
+SIMA+Der/vv+MMIRSUR+Der/vv+TSIAR+Der/vv+GALUAR+Der/vv:simammersutsiaraluar IV-mod_C ;
+SIMA+Der/vv+NAR+Der/vv:simanar IV-mod_nar ;
+SIMA+Der/vv+NAR+Der/vv+GALLAR+Der/vv:simanarallar gallar-iv ;
+SIMA+Der/vv+NAR+Der/vv+GALUAR+Der/vv:simanaraluar IV-mod_C ;
+SIMA+Der/vv+NAR+Der/vv+GUNAR+Der/vv:simanarunar IV-mod_C ;
+SIMA+Der/vv+NAR+Der/vv+GUNAR+Der/vv+GALUAR+Der/vv:simanarunaraluar IV-mod_C ;
+SIMA+Der/vv+NAR+Der/vv+GUNNAIR+Der/vv:simanarunnaar IV-mod_iC ;
+SIMA+Der/vv+NAR+Der/vv+KUJUP+Der/vv:simanakujup IV-mod_C ;
+SIMA+Der/vv+NAR+Der/vv+KUJUP+Der/vv+GALUAR+Der/vv:simanakujukkaluar IV-mod_C ;
+SIMA+Der/vv+NAR+Der/vv+LAAR+Der/vv:simanalaar IV-mod_laar ;
+SIMA+Der/vv+NAR+Der/vv+LLUINNAR+Der/vv:simanarluinnar IV-mod_C ;
+SIMA+Der/vv+NAR+Der/vv+LLUINNAR+Der/vv+GALUAR+Der/vv:simanarluinnaraluar IV-mod_C ;
+SIMA+Der/vv+NAR+Der/vv+NAAR+Der/vv:simananaar HTR_longV_GAQ_addi ;
+SIMA+Der/vv+NAR+Der/vv+NAAR+Der/vv:simananaar HTR_longV_GAQ_si ;
+SIMA+Der/vv+NAR+Der/vv+NAVIAR+Der/vv+NNGIT+Der/vv:simanarnavianngi IV-mod_nngit ;
+SIMA+Der/vv+NAR+Der/vv+NGAAR+Der/vv:simanangaar IV-mod_C ;
+SIMA+Der/vv+NAR+Der/vv+NGAAR+Der/vv+GALUAR+Der/vv:simanangaaraluar IV-mod_C ;
+SIMA+Der/vv+NAR+Der/vv+NIKUU+Der/vv:simanarnikuu IV-mod_V ;
+SIMA+Der/vv+NAR+Der/vv+NIRAR+Der/vv:simanarnerar HTR_r_GAQ_i ;
+SIMA+Der/vv+NAR+Der/vv+NIRU+Der/vv:simanarneru IV-mod_V ;
+SIMA+Der/vv+NAR+Der/vv+NNGIT+Der/vv:simananngi IV-mod_nngit ;
+SIMA+Der/vv+NAR+Der/vv+PALUP+Der/vv:simanarpalup IV-mod_C ;
+SIMA+Der/vv+NAR+Der/vv+PALUP+Der/vv+GALUAR+Der/vv:simanarpalukkaluar IV-mod_C ;
+SIMA+Der/vv+NAR+Der/vv+PASIP+Der/vv:simanarpasip IV-mod_iC ;
+SIMA+Der/vv+NAR+Der/vv+PIAR+Der/vv+NNGIT+Der/vv:simanarpianngi IV-mod_nngit ;
+SIMA+Der/vv+NAR+Der/vv+TIP+Der/vv:simanartip HTR_C_TAQ_tsi ;
+SIMA+Der/vv+NAR+Der/vv+VALLAAR+Der/vv+NNGIT+Der/vv:simanarpallaanngi IV-mod_nngit ;
+SIMA+Der/vv+NASUGE+Der/vv+Dial/Ngr:simanasug Saq_schwa ;
+SIMA+Der/vv+NASUGE+Der/vv+Dial/Ngr+Gram/Refl:simanasug IV-mod_schwa ;
+SIMA+Der/vv+NASURE+Der/vv:simanasor Saq_schwa ;
+SIMA+Der/vv+NASURE+Der/vv+Gram/Refl:simanasor IV-mod_schwa ;
+SIMA+Der/vv+NAVIAR+Der/vv+NNGIT+Der/vv:simanavianngi IV-mod_nngit ;
+SIMA+Der/vv+NAVIAR+Der/vv+NNGIT+Der/vv+GALUAR+Der/vv:simanavianngikkaluar IV-mod_C ;
+SIMA+Der/vv+NGAAR+Der/vv:simangaar IV-mod_C ;
+SIMA+Der/vv+NGAAR+Der/vv+GALUAR+Der/vv:simangaaraluar IV-mod_C ;
+SIMA+Der/vv+NGAAR+Der/vv+TAAR+Der/vv:simangaataar IV-mod_C ;
+SIMA+Der/vv+NGAAR+Der/vv+TAAR+Der/vv+GALUAR+Der/vv:simangaataaraluar IV-mod_C ;
+SIMA+Der/vv+NGAAR+Der/vv+TSIAR+Der/vv:simangaatsiar IV-mod_C ;
+SIMA+Der/vv+NGAAR+Der/vv+TSIAR+Der/vv+GALUAR+Der/vv:simangaatsiaraluar IV-mod_C ;
+SIMA+Der/vv+NGAAR+Der/vv+TSIAR+Der/vv+RIIR+Der/vv:simangaatsiareer IV-mod_iC ;
+SIMA+Der/vv+NIAR+Der/vv:simaniar IV-mod_C ;
+SIMA+Der/vv+NIAR+Der/vv+GALUAR+Der/vv:simaniaraluar IV-mod_C ;
+SIMA+Der/vv+NIARSARE+Der/vv:simaniarsar IV-mod_schwa ;
+SIMA+Der/vv+NIARSARE+Der/vv+INNAR+Der/vv:simaniarsariinnar IV-mod_C ;
+SIMA+Der/vv+NIARSARE+Der/vv+INNAR+Der/vv+GALUAR+Der/vv:simaniarsariinnaraluar IV-mod_C ; 
+SIMA+Der/vv+NIARSARE+Der/vv+INNAR+Der/vv+NIAR+Der/vv:simaniarsariinnarniar IV-mod_C ;
+SIMA+Der/vv+NIARSARE+Der/vv+INNAR+Der/vv+NIAR+Der/vv+GALUAR+Der/vv:simaniarsariinnarniaraluar IV-mod_C ;
+SIMA+Der/vv+NIARSARE+Der/vv+INNAR+Der/vv+RIAR+Der/vv:simaniarsariinnariar IV-mod_C ;
+SIMA+Der/vv+NIARSARE+Der/vv+INNAR+Der/vv+RIAR+Der/vv+GALUAR+Der/vv:simaniarsariinnariaraluar IV-mod_C ;
+SIMA+Der/vv+NIARSARE+Der/vv+INNAR+Der/vv+SSA+Der/vv:simaniarsariinnassa IV-mod_ssa ;
+SIMA+Der/vv+NIAR+Der/vv+VISSUR+Der/vv:simaniavissor IV-mod_C ;
+SIMA+Der/vv+NIAR+Der/vv+VISSUR+Der/vv+GALUAR+Der/vv:simaniavissoraluar IV-mod_C ;
+SIMA+Der/vv+NIRAR+Der/vv:simanerar HTR_r_GAQ_i ;
+SIMA+Der/vv+NIRU+Der/vv:simaneru IV-mod_V ;
+SIMA+Der/vv+NNGIT+Der/vv:simanngi IV-mod_nngit ;
+SIMA+Der/vv+NNGIT+Der/vv+GALLAR+Der/vv:simanngikkallar gallar-iv ;
+SIMA+Der/vv+NNGIT+Der/vv+GALLAR+Der/vv+TIP+Der/vv+Gram/Refl:simanngikkallartip IV-mod_C ;
+SIMA+Der/vv+NNGIT+Der/vv+GALUAR+Der/vv:simanngikkaluar IV-mod_C ;
+SIMA+Der/vv+NNGIT+Der/vv+INNAR+Der/vv:simanngiinnar IV-mod_C ;
+SIMA+Der/vv+NNGIT+Der/vv+INNAR+Der/vv+GALUAR+Der/vv:simanngiinnaraluar IV-mod_C ;
+SIMA+Der/vv+NNGIT+Der/vv+INNAR+Der/vv+SIMA+Der/vv:simanngiinnarsima IV-mod_V ;
+SIMA+Der/vv+NNGIT+Der/vv+LLUINNAR+Der/vv:simanngilluinnar IV-mod_C ;
+SIMA+Der/vv+NNGIT+Der/vv+LLUINNAR+Der/vv+GALUAR+Der/vv:simanngilluinnaraluar IV-mod_C ;
+SIMA+Der/vv+NNGIT+Der/vv+NAR+Der/vv:simannginnar IV-mod_nar ;
+SIMA+Der/vv+NNGIT+Der/vv+NGAAR+Der/vv:simanngingaar IV-mod_C ;
+SIMA+Der/vv+NNGIT+Der/vv+NIRAR+Der/vv:simannginnerar HTR_r_GAQ_i ;
+SIMA+Der/vv+NNGIT+Der/vv+RIIR+Der/vv:simanngereer IV-mod_iC ;
+SIMA+Der/vv+NNGIT+Der/vv+TIP+Der/vv:simanngitsip HTR_C_TAQ_tsi ;
+SIMA+Der/vv+NNGIT+Der/vv+VIP+Der/vv:simanngivip IV-mod_iC ;
+SIMA+Der/vv+NNGUAR+Der/vv+KASIP+Der/vv:simannguakasip XIiX ;
+SIMA+Der/vv+NNGUATSIAR+Der/vv:simannguatsiar IV-mod_C ;
+SIMA+Der/vv+NNGUATSIAR+Der/vv+GALUAR+Der/vv:simannguatsiaraluar IV-mod_C ;
+SIMA+Der/vv+NNGUATSIAR+Der/vv+QE+Der/vv:simannguatsia%TRUNCq IV-mod_qe ;  !20170503
+SIMA+Der/vv+PALUP+Der/vv:simarpalup IV-mod_C ;
+SIMA+Der/vv+PALUP+Der/vv+GALUAR+Der/vv:simarpalukkaluar IV-mod_C ;
+SIMA+Der/vv+PALUP+Der/vv+LAAR+Der/vv:simarpalulaar IV-mod_laar ;
+SIMA+Der/vv+PALUP+Der/vv+LAAR+Der/vv+RIAR+Der/vv:simarpalulaariar IV-mod_C ;
+SIMA+Der/vv+PALUP+Der/vv+LAAR+Der/vv+RIAR+Der/vv+GALUAR+Der/vv:simarpalulaariaraluar IV-mod_C ;
+SIMA+Der/vv+PALUP+Der/vv+NNGIT+Der/vv:simarpalunngi IV-mod_nngit ;
+SIMA+Der/vv+PALUP+Der/vv+NNGIT+Der/vv+GALUAR+Der/vv:simarpalunngikkaluar IV-mod_C ;
+SIMA+Der/vv+PALUP+Der/vv+NNGIT+Der/vv+GALUAR+Der/vv+QE+Der/vv:simarpalunngikkalua%TRUNCq IV-mod_qe ;
+SIMA+Der/vv+PALUP+Der/vv+NNGIT+Der/vv+VIP+Der/vv:simarpalunngivip IV-mod_iC ;
+SIMA+Der/vv+PALUP+Der/vv+NNGIT+Der/vv+VIP+Der/vv+GALUAR+Der/vv:simarpalunngivikkaluar IV-mod_C ;
+SIMA+Der/vv+PALUP+Der/vv+NNGIT+Der/vv+VIP+Der/vv+GALUAR+Der/vv+QE+Der/vv:simarpalunngivikkalua%TRUNCq IV-mod_qe ;
+SIMA+Der/vv+PALUP+Der/vv+VIP+Der/vv:simarpaluip IV-mod_iC ;
+SIMA+Der/vv+PALAAR+Der/vv:simarpalaar IV-mod_C ;
+SIMA+Der/vv+PALAAR+Der/vv+GALUAR+Der/vv:simarpalaaraluar IV-mod_C ;
+SIMA+Der/vv+PALAAR+Der/vv+RIIR+Der/vv:simarpalaareer IV-mod_iC ;
+SIMA+Der/vv+PALAAR+Der/vv+RIIR+Der/vv+TIGE+Der/vv:simarpalaareertig flex-iv_schwa ;
+SIMA+Der/vv+PALAAR+Der/vv+TIGE+Der/vv:simarpalaartig flex-iv_schwa ;
+SIMA+Der/vv+PASIP+Der/vv:simarpasip IV-mod_iC ;
+SIMA+Der/vv+PASIP+Der/vv+GALUAR+Der/vv:simarpasikkaluar IV-mod_C ;
+SIMA+Der/vv+PASIP+Der/vv+NNGIT+Der/vv:simarpasinngi IV-mod_nngit ;
+SIMA+Der/vv+PASIP+Der/vv+NNGIT+Der/vv+VIP+Der/vv:simarpasinngivip IV-mod_iC ;
+SIMA+Der/vv+PIAR+Der/vv:simarpiar IV-mod_C ;
+SIMA+Der/vv+PIAR+Der/vv+GALUAR+Der/vv:simarpiaraluar IV-mod_C ;
+SIMA+Der/vv+PIAR+Der/vv+GALUAR+Der/vv+QE+Der/vv:simarpiaralua%TRUNCq IV-mod_qe ;
+SIMA+Der/vv+PIAR+Der/vv+GUNNAIR+Der/vv:simarpiarunnaar IV-mod_iC ;
+SIMA+Der/vv+PIAR+Der/vv+GUNNAIR+Der/vv+GALUAR+Der/vv:simarpiarunnaaraluar IV-mod_C ;
+SIMA+Der/vv+PIAR+Der/vv+GUNNAIR+Der/vv+GALUAR+Der/vv+QE+Der/vv:simarpiarunnaaralua%TRUNCq IV-mod_qe ;
+SIMA+Der/vv+QE+Der/vv:sima%TRUNCq IV-mod_qe ; 
+SIMA+Der/vv+QINA+Der/vv:simaqina flex-iv_qina ;
+SIMA+Der/vv+QQA+Der/vv+LAAR+Der/vv+INNAR+Der/vv:simaqqalaaginnar IV-mod_C ;
+SIMA+Der/vv+QQA+Der/vv+LAAR+Der/vv+INNAR+Der/vv+GALUAR+Der/vv:simaqqalaaginnaraluar IV-mod_C ;
+SIMA+Der/vv+QQAAR+Der/vv:simaqqaar IV-mod_C ;
+SIMA+Der/vv+QQAAR+Der/vv+GALUAR+Der/vv:simaqqaaraluar IV-mod_C ;
+SIMA+Der/vv+QQIP+Der/vv:simaqqip IV-mod_iC ;
+SIMA+Der/vv+QQU+Der/vv:simaqqu DOTR_IV_V ;
+SIMA+Der/vv+QQU+Der/vv+NNGIT+Der/vv:simaqqunngi IV-mod_nngit ;
+SIMA+Der/vv+RATAR+Der/vv:simaratar IV-mod_r ;
+SIMA+Der/vv+RATAR+Der/vv+NNGUAR+Der/vv:simaratannguar IV-mod_nnguar ;
+SIMA+Der/vv+RATAR+Der/vv+SINNAA+Der/vv:simaratarsinnaa IV-mod_V ;
+SIMA+Der/vv+RIAR+Der/vv:simariar IV-mod_C ;
+SIMA+Der/vv+RIAR+Der/vv:simariar Gaq ;
+SIMA+Der/vv+RIAR+Der/vv+GALUAR+Der/vv:simariaraluar IV-mod_C ;
+SIMA+Der/vv+RIAR+Der/vv+LLAR+Der/vv:simariallar IV-mod_C ;
+SIMA+Der/vv+RIIR+Der/vv:simareer IV-mod_iC ;
+SIMA+Der/vv+RUSAAR+Der/vv:simarusaar IV-mod_C ;
+SIMA+Der/vv+RUSAAR+Der/vv+GALUAR+Der/vv:simarusaaraluar IV-mod_C ;
+SIMA+Der/vv+RUTTUR+Der/vv:simaruttor IV-mod_C ; !12022020 Panie
+SIMA+Der/vv+RUTTUR+Der/vv+GALUAR+Der/vv:simaruttoraluar IV-mod_C ;
+SIMA+Der/vv+RUUSAAR+Der/vv:simaruusaar IV-mod_C ;
+SIMA+Der/vv+RUUSAAR+Der/vv+GALUAR+Der/vv:simaruusaaraluar IV-mod_C ;
+SIMA+Der/vv+SINNAA+Der/vv:simasinnaa IV-mod_V ;
+SIMA+Der/vv+SINNAA+Der/vv+GALUAR+Der/vv:simasinnaagaluar IV-mod_C ;
+SIMA+Der/vv+SINNAA+Der/vv+GUMA+Der/vv:simasinnaajuma IV-mod_V ;
+SIMA+Der/vv+SINNAA+Der/vv+NNGIT+Der/vv:simasinnaanngi IV-mod_nngit ;
+SIMA+Der/vv+SINNAA+Der/vv+QQU+Der/vv:simasinnaaqqu DOTR_IV_V ;
+SIMA+Der/vv+SSA+Der/vv:simassa IV-mod_ssa ;
+SIMA+Der/vv+SSA+Der/vv+GALUAR+Der/vv:simassagaluar IV-mod_C ;
+SIMA+Der/vv+SSA+Der/vv+GUNAR+Der/vv:simassagunar IV-mod_C ;
+SIMA+Der/vv+SSA+Der/vv+GUNAR+Der/vv+GALUAR+Der/vv:simassagunaraluar IV-mod_C ;
+SIMA+Der/vv+SSA+Der/vv+NGA+Der/vv+TIP+Der/vv:simassangatip HTR_C_TAQ_tsi ;
+SIMA+Der/vv+SSA+Der/vv+NNGIT+Der/vv:simassanngi IV-mod_nngit ; 
+SIMA+Der/vv+SSA+Der/vv+NNGIT+Der/vv+GALUAR+Der/vv:simassanngikkaluar IV-mod_C ;
+SIMA+Der/vv+SSA+Der/vv+QE+Der/vv:simassa%TRUNCq IV-mod_qe ;
+SIMA+Der/vv+SURE+Der/vv:simasor flex-tv_schwa ;
+SIMA+Der/vv+TARE+Der/vv:simasar flex-iv_schwa ;
+SIMA+Der/vv+TARIAQAR+Der/vv:simasariaqar IV-mod_C ;
+SIMA+Der/vv+TARIAQAR+Der/vv+GALUAR+Der/vv:simasariaqaraluar IV-mod_C ;
+SIMA+Der/vv+TARIAQAR+Der/vv+GUNAR+Der/vv:simasariaqarunar IV-mod_C ;
+SIMA+Der/vv+TARIAQAR+Der/vv+GUNAR+Der/vv+GALUAR+Der/vv:simasariaqarunaraluar IV-mod_C ;
+SIMA+Der/vv+TIGE+Der/vv:simatig IV-mod_schwa ;
+SIMA+Der/vv+TIGE+Der/vv+NNGIT+Der/vv:simatiginngi IV-mod_nngit ;
+SIMA+Der/vv+TIP+Der/vv:simatip HTR_C_TAQ_tsi ;
+SIMA+Der/vv+TSIAR+Der/vv:simatsiar IV-mod_C ;
+SIMA+Der/vv+TSIAR+Der/vv+GALUAR+Der/vv:simatsiaraluar IV-mod_C ;
+SIMA+Der/vv+TSIAR+Der/vv+INNAR+Der/vv:simatsiaannar IV-mod_C ;
+SIMA+Der/vv+TSIAR+Der/vv+INNAR+Der/vv+GALUAR+Der/vv:simatsiaannaraluar IV-mod_C ;
+SIMA+Der/vv+TSIAR+Der/vv+RIAR+Der/vv:simatsiariar IV-mod_C ;
+SIMA+Der/vv+TSIAR+Der/vv+RIAR+Der/vv+GALUAR+Der/vv:simatsiariaraluar IV-mod_C ;
+SIMA+Der/vv+TSIAR+Der/vv+RIIR+Der/vv:simatsiareer IV-mod_iC ;
+SIMA+Der/vv+TUAR+Der/vv:simajuar IV-mod_C ;
+SIMA+Der/vv+TUAR+Der/vv:simajuar Gaq ;
+SIMA+Der/vv+TUAR+Der/vv+GALUAR+Der/vv:simajuaraluar IV-mod_C ;
+SIMA+Der/vv+TUAR+Der/vv+GUMA+Der/vv:simajuaruma IV-mod_V ;
+SIMA+Der/vv+TUAR+Der/vv+INNAR+Der/vv:simajuaannar IV-mod_C ;
+SIMA+Der/vv+TUAR+Der/vv+INNAR+Der/vv+GALUAR+Der/vv:simajuaannaraluar IV-mod_C ;
+SIMA+Der/vv+TUAR+Der/vv+INNAR+Der/vv+NGAJAP+Der/vv:simajuaannangajap IV-mod_C ;
+SIMA+Der/vv+TUAR+Der/vv+INNAR+Der/vv+NGAJAP+Der/vv+GALUAR+Der/vv:simajuaannangajakkaluar IV-mod_C ;
+SIMA+Der/vv+TUAR+Der/vv+IT+Der/vv:simajuip XItsX ;
+SIMA+Der/vv+TUAR+Der/vv+NIAR+Der/vv:simajuarniar IV-mod_C ;
+SIMA+Der/vv+TUAR+Der/vv+NIAR+Der/vv+GALUAR+Der/vv:simajuarniaraluar IV-mod_C ;
+SIMA+Der/vv+VALLAAR+Der/vv:simavallaar IV-mod_C ;
+SIMA+Der/vv+VALLAAR+Der/vv+GALUAR+Der/vv:simavallaaraluar IV-mod_C ;
+SIMA+Der/vv+VALLAAR+Der/vv+NNGIT+Der/vv:simavallaanngi IV-mod_nngit ;
+SIMA+Der/vv+VALLAAR+Der/vv+TSIAR+Der/vv:simavallaatsiar IV-mod_C ;
+SIMA+Der/vv+VALLAAR+Der/vv+TSIAR+Der/vv+GALUAR+Der/vv:simavallaatsiaraluar IV-mod_C ;
+SIMA+Der/vv+VIP+Der/vv:simavip IV-mod_iC ;
